Texas, session 892, HB205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter D, Chapter 505, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 505.162 to read as follows: Sec. 505.162.  PROJECTS RELATED TO RECOVERY FROM DISASTER. (a)  For purposes of this chapter, "project" includes a project described by Subsection (b). (b)  A Type B corporation may undertake the following projects only in direct connection with a disaster that has been declared by the governor under Section 418.014, Government Code, or by the president of the United States: (1)  a grant or loan of money to a business enterprise damaged by a disaster, including a grant or loan for the temporary relocation of the business or the repair or elevation of the business's infrastructure; and (2)  action to strengthen the work force in and stabilize the economy of the authorizing municipality. (c)  In addition to any other requirement of this chapter, a project authorized by this section must be: (1)  approved by the governing body of the Type B corporation's authorizing municipality; (2)  undertaken not later than the second anniversary of the date of the disaster declaration; and (3)  sufficiently documented to allow the governing body of the Type B corporation's authorizing municipality to provide oversight of the project. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.